Arkansas, session 2025, HB1459.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 25, Chapter 1, Subchapter 2, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
25-1-207. Submission of recurring reports to General Assembly —
Definition.
(a) As used in this section, "recurring report" means a report that is
to be filed more than one (1) time and is:
(1) Required by statute; or
(2) Requested by the General Assembly, one (1) or more
committees or subcommittees of the General Assembly, or one (1) or more
officers of the General Assembly.
(b) If a state agency is required to file a recurring report with the
General Assembly, one (1) or more committees or subcommittees of the General
Assembly, or one (1) or more officers of the General Assembly, the state
agency shall file the recurring report three (3) times in the required
manner.
(c)(1) Following the third submission of a recurring report under
subsection (b) of this section, the state agency shall not file subsequent
reports unless requested by the entity or individual receiving the report.
*MBM067*
02/11/2025 4:12:44 PM MBM067

HB1459
(2) Upon the third submission of a recurring report, the state
agency shall inform the entity or individual receiving the report that no
subsequent reports will be filed unless requested under subdivision (c)(1) of
this section.
(d) This section does not prohibit the General Assembly, one (1) or
more committees or subcommittees of the General Assembly, or one (1) or more
officers of the General Assembly from directing a state agency to resume
filing a recurring report following the cessation of reporting under this
section.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. IMPLEMENTATION.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, this act
shall be applied prospectively so that a state agency shall file a recurring
report three (3) times on or following the effective date of this act before
ceasing reporting under this act.
(b) If the General Assembly, one (1) or more committees or
subcommittees of the General Assembly, or one (1) or more officers of the
General Assembly has received a report from a state agency more than three
(3) times before the effective date of this act, the entity or individual may
request that the state agency not file subsequent reports unless requested by
the entity or individual.















02/11/2025 4:12:44 PM MBM067